Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2116XC (4) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.301, subsection 17, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. The board of supervisors may by ordinance or resolution 3 prohibit or limit the use of consumer fireworks or display 4 fireworks, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than 5 July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 6 727.2, subsection 4, if the board determines that the use of 7 such devices would constitute a threat to public safety or 8 private property, or if the board determines that the use 9 of such devices would constitute a nuisance to neighboring 10 landowners. 11 Sec. 2. Section 364.2, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 6. A city council may by ordinance or resolution prohibit 14 or limit the use of consumer fireworks, display fireworks, or 15 novelties, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than 16 July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 17 727.2, subsection 4 . 18